Georgia statutes. TITLE 23 Equity
Article 1 General Provisions

23-3-1.
Legal and equitable rights given effect; legal and equitable remedies applied.

The superior courts, on the trial of any civil case, shall give effect to all the rights of the parties, legal, equitable, or both, and apply remedies or relief, legal, equitable, or both, in favor of either party, as the nature of the case may allow or require.

History.

Ga. L. 1887, p. 64, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 4833; Civil Code 1910, § 5406; Code 1933, § 37-901.

Law reviews.

For comment on McMillian v. Spencer,

162 Ga. 659

,

134 S.E. 921

(1926), see 1 Ga. L. Rev. 52 (1927).

For article discussing third party beneficiary contracts, see 4 Ga. B.J. 19 (1941).

For comment on Waters v. Waters,

217 Ga. 557

,

123 S.E.2d 765

(1962), see 25 Ga. B.J. 419 (1963).

23-3-2.
How equitable relief claimed.

Any person may, in any civil action, claim equitable relief by appropriate and sufficient pleadings and obtain the equitable relief proper in the case.

History.

Ga. L. 1884-85, p. 36, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 4834; Civil Code 1910, § 5407; Code 1933, § 37-902.

Law reviews.

For comment on McMillian v. Spencer,

162 Ga. 659

,

134 S.E. 921

(1926), see 1 Ga. L. Rev. 52 (1927).

23-3-3.
Ancillary extraordinary remedies.

A person who asserts a claim for equitable relief may at any time, by proper pleading and proof, also apply for and obtain any of the extraordinary remedies available from the court in its exercise of equitable powers.

History.

Ga. L. 1884-85, p. 36, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 4836; Civil Code 1910, § 5409; Code 1933, § 37-904.

Law reviews.

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (2008).

23-3-4.
Extraordinary remedies for defendant.

Any defendant may, by proper pleadings and sufficient evidence, obtain the benefit of extraordinary remedies allowed in equitable proceedings by the superior court.

History.

Ga. L. 1884-85, p. 36, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 4838; Civil Code 1910, § 5411; Code 1933, § 37-906.